Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-277
Commission on the status of women; establish; fund.

A city of the primary class may establish and fund a commission on the status of women. Such commission shall advise the mayor and city council on the existence of social, economic, and legal barriers affecting women and ways to eliminate such barriers.

Laws 1980, LB 780, § 3.